Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Legislative Findings. The Legislative Assembly finds that:
(1) Employees experience  a variety of caregiving obligations that interfere with work
time.
(2) It is in the public interest to create a family and medical  leave insurance program to
provide to employees and  certain other individuals compensated time off from work to care
for and bond with a child during  the first year after the child’s birth or arrival through
adoption or foster care,  to provide care for a family member who has a serious health con-
dition or to recover from an employee’s or an individual’s own serious health condition.
SECTION 2. Definitions. As used in sections 1 to 51 of this 2019 Act:
(1) “Alternate base year” means the last  four completed calendar quarters preceding the
benefit year.
(2) “Average weekly wage” means  the amount calculated by the Employment Department
as the state average weekly covered wage under ORS 657.150 (4)(d) as determined not  more
than once per year.
(3) “Base year” means the first four of the last five  completed calendar quarters pre-
ceding the benefit year.
(4) “Benefits” means family and medical leave insurance benefits.
(5) “Benefit year” means the 12-month period as  determined by the Director of the Em-
ployment Department by rule under section 33 of this 2019 Act.
(6) “Child” means:
(a) A biological child, adopted child, stepchild or  foster child of a covered individual or
of the covered individual’s spouse or domestic partner;
(b) A person who is or was a legal ward of a covered individual or of the covered
individual’s spouse or domestic partner; or
(c) A person who is or was in a relationship of in loco parentis with a  covered individual
or with the covered individual’s spouse or domestic partner.
Enrolled House Bill 2005 (HB 2005-B) Page 1
(7) “Contribution” or “contributions” means the money payments made by any of the
following under section 16 of this 2019 Act:
(a) An employer;
(b) An eligible employee;
(c) A self-employed individual;
(d) A tribal government; or
(e) An employee of a tribal government.
(8) “Covered individual”  means any one of the following who qualifies to receive family
and medical leave insurance benefits:
(a) An eligible employee;
(b) A self-employed individual; or
(c) An employee of a tribal government.
(9) “Domestic partner” means an individual joined in a domestic partnership.
(10) “Domestic partnership” has the meaning given that term in ORS 106.310.
(11) “Eligible employee” means:
(a)(A) An employee who has earned at least $1,000 in wages during the base year; or
(B) If an employee has not earned at  least $1,000 in wages during the base year, an em-
ployee who has earned at least $1,000 in wages during the alternate base year; and
(b) Who may apply for paid family and medical leave insurance benefits under section 3
of this 2019 Act.
(12) “Eligible employee’s average weekly wage” means an amount calculated by  the Di-
rector of the Employment Department  by dividing the total wages earned by an eligible em-
ployee during the base year by the number of weeks in the base year.
(13)(a) “Employee” means:
(A) An individual performing services  for an employer for remuneration or under any
contract of hire, written or oral, express or implied.
(B) A home care worker as defined in ORS 410.600.
(b) “Employee” does not include:
(A) An independent contractor as defined in ORS 670.600.
(B) A participant in a work training program administered under a  state or federal as-
sistance program.
(C) A participant  in a work-study program that provides students in secondary or
postsecondary educational institutions with employment  opportunities for financial assist-
ance or vocational training.
(D) A railroad worker exempted under the federal  Railroad Unemployment Insurance
Act.
(E) A volunteer.
(14)(a) “Employer” means any  person that employs one or more employees working
anywhere in this state or any agent or employee of such person to  whom the duties of the
person under sections 1 to 51 of this 2019 Act have been delegated.
(b) “Employer” includes:
(A) A political subdivision of this  state or any county, city, district, authority or public
corporation, or any instrumentality of a county, city, district, authority or public corpo-
ration, organized and existing under law or charter;
(B) An individual;
(C) Any type of organization, corporation, partnership, limited liability  company, associ-
ation, trust, estate, joint stock company or insurance company;
(D) Any successor in interest to an entity described in subparagraph  (C) of this para-
graph;
(E) A trustee, trustee in bankruptcy or receiver; or
(F) A trustee or legal representative of a deceased person.
(c) “Employer” does not include the federal government or a tribal government.
Enrolled House Bill 2005 (HB 2005-B) Page 2
(15) “Employment agency” has the meaning given that term in ORS 658.005.
(16) “Family and medical leave insurance benefits” means  the wage replacement benefits
that are available to a covered individual under section 7 of this 2019 Act or under the terms
of an employer plan approved under section 43 of this 2019 Act,  for family leave, medical
leave or safe leave.
(17)(a) “Family leave” means leave from work taken by a covered individual:
(A) To care for and bond with a child during the first year after  the child’s birth or
during the first year after the placement of the child through foster care or adoption; or
(B) To care for a family member with a serious health condition.
(b) “Family leave” does not mean:
(A) Leave described in ORS 659A.159 (1)(d);
(B) Leave described in ORS 659A.159 (1)(e); or
(C) Leave authorized under ORS 659A.093.
(18) “Family member” means:
(a) The spouse of a covered individual;
(b) A child of a covered individual or the child’s spouse or domestic partner;
(c) A parent of a covered individual or the parent’s spouse or domestic partner;
(d) A  sibling or stepsibling of a covered individual or the sibling’s or stepsibling’s spouse
or domestic partner;
(e) A grandparent of a  covered individual or the grandparent’s spouse or domestic part-
ner;
(f) A grandchild of a covered individual or the grandchild’s spouse or domestic partner;
(g) The domestic partner of a covered individual; or
(h) Any individual related  by blood or affinity whose close association with a covered in-
dividual is the equivalent of a family relationship.
(19) “Medical leave” means leave from work taken by  a covered individual that is made
necessary by the individual’s own serious health condition.
(20) “Parent” means:
(a) A biological parent,  adoptive parent, stepparent or foster parent of a covered indi-
vidual;
(b) A person who was  a foster parent of a covered individual when the covered individual
was a minor;
(c) A person designated as the legal guardian of a covered  individual at the time the
covered individual was a minor or required a legal guardian;
(d) A person with whom a covered individual was or is in a relationship  of in loco
parentis; or
(e) A parent  of a covered individual’s spouse or domestic partner who meets a description
under paragraphs (a) to (d) of this subsection.
(21) “Safe leave” means leave taken for any purpose described in 659A.272.
(22) “Self-employed individual” means:
(a) An individual who has  self-employment income as defined in section 1402(b) of the
Internal Revenue Code as amended and in effect on December 31, 2018; or
(b) An independent contractor as defined in ORS 670.600.
(23) “Serious health condition” has the meaning given that term in ORS 659A.150.
(24) “Third party  administrator” means a third party that enters into an agreement with
the Director of the Employment Department to implement and administer the  paid family
and medical leave program established under sections 1 to 51 of this 2019 Act.
(25) “Tribal government” has the meaning given that term in ORS 181A.680.
(26) “Wages” has the meaning given that term in ORS 657.105.
BENEFITS
Enrolled House Bill 2005 (HB 2005-B) Page 3
SECTION 3. Benefit eligibility. Family and medical leave insurance benefits are  available
to any of the following during a period of family leave, medical leave or safe leave:
(1) An eligible employee who:
(a) During the base year or alternate base year, as applicable, contributes to the Paid
Family and Medical Leave Insurance Fund established under section  39 of this 2019 Act in
accordance with section 16 of this 2019 Act; and
(b) Submits a claim for benefits in accordance with the  requirements under section 12
of this 2019 Act;
(2) A self-employed individual who:
(a) Elects coverage under section 41 of this 2019 Act; and
(b) During the base year or alternate base year, as applicable, contributes to the Paid
Family and Medical Leave Insurance Fund established under section 39 of this 2019  Act an
amount determined by the Director of the Employment Department under section 16 of  this
2019 Act; or
(3) An employee of a tribal government, if:
(a) The tribal government elects coverage for its employees under section  41 of this 2019
Act;  and
(b) During the base year or alternate base  year, as applicable, the employee and tribal
government contribute  to the Paid Family and Medical Leave Insurance Fund established
under section 39 of  this 2019 Act an amount determined by the director under section 16 of
this 2019 Act.
SECTION 4.
Duration of benefits. (1) A covered individual may qualify for up to 12 weeks
of family and medical leave insurance benefits per benefit year for leave taken for any of  the
following purposes, in any combination:
(a) Family leave;
(b) Medical leave; or
(c) Safe leave.
(2) Notwithstanding section 5 of this  2019 Act and except as provided under subsection
(3) of this section, a covered individual who has taken any amount of  paid leave available
under subsection (1) of this section may take a total of 16 weeks  of leave in the benefit year
in any combination of the paid  leave available under subsection (1) of this section, not to
exceed 12 weeks, and unpaid leave  under ORS 659A.159 for which the covered individual is
eligible under ORS 659A.156. The leave may  be taken for any purpose for which leave is al-
lowable under the respective leave programs.
(3) In addition to the leave available under subsections (1)  and (2) of this section, a cov-
ered individual may qualify for up to two additional weeks of benefits for limitations related
to pregnancy, childbirth or a related  medical condition, including but not limited to lactation,
for a total amount of leave under this subsection and subsections (1) and (2) of this section,
not to exceed 18 weeks per benefit year.
SECTION 5.
Coordination of leave. Any family leave or medical leave taken under
sections 1 to 51  of this 2019 Act must be taken concurrently with any leave taken by an eli-
gible employee under ORS 659A.150 to 659A.186 or under  the federal Family and Medical
Leave Act of 1993 (P.L. 103-3) for the same purposes.
SECTION 6. Other benefits; use of paid leave. (1) Family and medical leave  insurance
benefits are in addition to any paid sick time under ORS 653.606, vacation leave or  other paid
leave earned by an employee.
(2) An employer may permit an employee to use paid sick time, vacation leave or any
other paid leave earned by the  employee in addition to receiving paid family and medical
leave insurance benefits to replace an employee’s wages  up to 100 percent of the eligible
employee’s average weekly wage during a period of leave taken for  family leave, medical
leave or safe leave.
Enrolled House Bill 2005 (HB 2005-B) Page 4
(3) In  any week in which an employee is eligible to receive workers’ compensation or
unemployment benefits  under ORS chapter 656 or 657, the employee is disqualified from re-
ceiving family and medical leave insurance benefits.
SECTION 7. Amount of benefits. (1) The Director  of the Employment Department shall
set the weekly benefit amount of family and medical leave insurance benefits  that a covered
individual qualifies for as follows:
(a) If the eligible employee’s average weekly wage is equal to or less than 65 percent  of
the average  weekly wage, the employee’s weekly benefit amount shall be 100 percent of the
employee’s average weekly wage.
(b) If the eligible employee’s average weekly wage  is greater than 65 percent of the av-
erage weekly wage, the employee’s weekly benefit amount is the sum of:
(A) 65 percent of the average weekly wage; and
(B) 50 percent of the employee’s  average weekly wage that is greater than 65 percent of
the average weekly wage.
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, the director shall establish:
(a) A maximum weekly benefit amount of 120 percent of the average weekly wage.
(b) A minimum weekly benefit amount of five percent of the average weekly wage.
(3) The director shall determine, based on the  contribution amounts made by a self-
employed individual, a tribal government  or the employees of a tribal government under
section 16 of this 2019 Act, the amount of benefits payable to a self-employed individual or
to an employee of a tribal government.
(4) Benefits are payable only to the extent  that moneys are available in the Paid Family
and Medical Leave Insurance Fund for that purpose. The state, any political subdivision of
the state and any state agency are not liable for any amount in excess of this limit.
SECTION 8.
Notice to employees. (1) An employer shall  provide written notice to each
employee of the duties and rights of  an eligible employee under sections 1 to 51 of this 2019
Act in accordance with rules adopted by the Director of the  Employment Department. At a
minimum, the notice must advise the employee of the following:
(a) The right of an  eligible employee to claim and receive family and medical leave in-
surance benefits under sections 1 to 51 of this 2019 Act;
(b) The procedure for filing a claim for benefits under section 12 of this 2019 Act;
(c) That an eligible employee  must provide notice to an employer before the employee
commences leave, as required under section 9 of this 2019 Act, and a  description of the
penalties for failure to comply with the notice requirements;
(d) The right of an eligible employee to job protection and benefits continuation  under
section 10 of this 2019 Act;
(e) The right of an eligible employee to appeal  a decision or determination made by the
director under section 31 of this 2019 Act;
(f) That discrimination and retaliatory personnel actions against an employee for inquir-
ing about the family  and medical leave insurance program established under section 33 of
this 2019 Act, giving notification of leave under the  program, taking leave under the program
or claiming family and medical leave insurance benefits are prohibited;
(g) The right of  an eligible employee to bring a civil action or to file a complaint for vi-
olation of section 10 or 11 of this 2019 Act; and
(h) That any health information related to family  leave, medical leave or safe leave pro-
vided to an employer by an employee is confidential and may  not be released without the
permission of the employee unless state or federal  law or a court order permits or requires
disclosure.
(2) A notice provided to an employee under this section  must be in the language the
employer typically uses to communicate with the employee.
(3) The director shall make available  to employers a model notice that meets the re-
quirements of this section.
Enrolled House Bill 2005 (HB 2005-B) Page 5
SECTION 9. Notice to employers. (1) Except as  provided in subsection (2) of this section,
an employer may require an eligible employee to give the  employer written notice at least
30 days before commencing a  period of family leave, medical leave or safe leave. The em-
ployer may require the employee to include in the  notice an explanation of the need for the
leave.
(2) An eligible employee may commence  leave without 30 days’ advance notice if the leave
is not foreseeable, as in circumstances including but not limited to:
(a) An unexpected serious health  condition of the employee or a family member of the
employee;
(b) A premature birth, unexpected adoption or unexpected  foster placement by or with
the employee; or
(c) Safe leave.
(3)(a) Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, if an eligible  employee com-
mences leave without prior notice under subsection  (2) of this section, the employee must
give oral notice to the employer within 24 hours of  the commencement of the leave and must
provide the written notice required under subsection (1) of this  section within three days
after the commencement of leave.
(b) The oral notice required by this subsection may be  given by any other person on be-
half of the eligible employee taking leave.
(c) The person named as the eligible employee’s emergency contact person, or  any other
person otherwise designated by the eligible employee, as reflected  in the employer’s records,
may provide the written notice required under subsection (1) of this section.
(4)(a) If an eligible employee fails to  give notice as required under subsections (2) and (3)
of this section, the Director of the Employment Department may  reduce the first weekly
benefit amount payable to the employee under section  12 of this 2019 Act by up to 25 percent.
(b) An employer shall notify the director  of the employee’s failure to provide the required
notice, in the manner prescribed by the director by rule.
(5) An eligible employee who takes safe  leave shall give the employer reasonable advance
notice of the individual’s  intention to take safe leave, unless giving the advance notice is not
feasible.
SECTION 10.
Employment protection; retaliation prohibited.
(1)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, after returning to work  af-
ter a  period of family leave, medical leave or safe leave, an eligible employee is entitled to
be restored to the position of employment held by the employee when  the leave commenced,
if that position still exists, without  regard to whether the employer filled the position with
a replacement worker during the period of leave. If the position held by  the employee at the
time leave commenced no longer exists, the employee is entitled to be  restored to any
available equivalent position with equivalent employment benefits, pay and other terms  and
conditions of employment.
(b) For employers that employ fewer than 25 employees, if the position  held by an eligible
employee when the employee’s leave commenced  no longer exists, an employer may, at the
employer’s discretion based on business necessity, restore the eligible employee to a different
position with similar job duties and with the same employment benefits and pay.
(2) During a period in which an eligible employee takes leave described  under subsection
(1) of this section, the employer shall maintain any health  care benefits the employee had
prior to taking such leave for the duration of the leave, as if the employee had continued  in
employment continuously during the period of leave.
(3) An  eligible employee who has taken leave described under subsection (1) of this sec-
tion does  not lose any employment benefits, including seniority or pension rights, accrued
before the date on which the leave commenced.
(4) It is an unlawful employment practice  to discriminate against an eligible employee
who has invoked any provision of sections 1 to 51 of this 2019 Act.
Enrolled House Bill 2005 (HB 2005-B) Page 6
(5) Nothing in this section  entitles an eligible employee to accrue employment benefits
during a period of leave or to a right,  benefit or position of employment other than a right,
benefit or position to which the  employee would have been entitled had the employee not
taken leave.
(6)(a) Nothing in this section requires  an employer to retain a temporary worker who
was hired to  replace an eligible employee taking family leave, medical leave or safe leave
after the eligible employee has returned to work.
(b) A  civil action may not be brought against an employer for taking any of the following
actions necessary to restore an eligible employee to the position  of employment held by the
employee as required under subsection (1) of this section:
(A) Terminating the employment of a worker who  was hired solely to temporarily replace
an eligible employee during a period of leave; or
(B) Removing an employee from a position to which the employee  was transferred to
temporarily replace an eligible employee  while the eligible employee was on leave, and re-
turning the  employee to the position originally held by the employee prior to the transfer
at the salary or rate of pay and benefits associated with the position.
(c) An employer shall,  either at the time of hire or before reassignment, inform a tem-
porary worker or an employee who is reassigned to a position  to temporarily replace an eli-
gible employee during a period of leave of the information provided under this subsection.
(7) The protections  provided under this section apply only to an eligible employee who
was employed by the employer  for at least 90 days before taking leave described under sub-
section (1) of this section.
SECTION 11. Denying leave; discrimination and retaliation prohibited. (1) It is an un-
lawful employment practice for an employer to:
(a) Violate section 10 of this 2019 Act.
(b) Deny leave or interfere with any other right to which an eligible employee  is entitled
under sections 1 to 51 of this 2019 Act.
(c) Retaliate or in  any way discriminate against an employee with respect to hire or
tenure or any other term or condition of employment because the employee has  inquired
about the rights or responsibilities under sections 1 to 51 of this 2019 Act.
(2) An employee who alleges a violation of this section may bring a civil action under ORS
659A.885 or  may file a complaint with the Commissioner of the Bureau of Labor and Indus-
tries in the manner provided by ORS 659A.820.
CLAIMS ADMINISTRATION
SECTION 12.
Claim for benefits. (1) Family and medical leave insurance benefits are not
payable to a covered individual unless:
(a) The individual submits a claim  to the Director of the Employment Department in the
manner determined by the director by rule; and
(b) The director has made a decision to allow  or deny the claim under section 13 of this
2019 Act.
(2) If the director has made a decision to allow the  claim, the director shall make a
reasonable effort to issue the first payment of benefits to a covered individual within two
weeks after receiving the claim.
(3)(a) Benefits may be claimed for  leave that is taken by a covered individual in incre-
ments that are equivalent to one work day or one work week as those  terms are defined by
the director by rule.
(b) If a covered individual takes leave in increments that are equivalent to one work  day,
benefits may be claimed  for leave that occurs in nonconsecutive periods of leave that, when
combined, provide the minimum benefit amount provided in section 7 of this 2019 Act.
(4) Benefit amounts, as determined under section 7 of this 2019 Act:
Enrolled House Bill 2005 (HB 2005-B) Page 7
(a) Must be prorated to increments that are equivalent to one work day; and
(b) Must be paid in increments that are equivalent to one work week.
SECTION 13.
Allowing or denying claim; notice  of denial; appeal. (1) The Director of the
Employment Department shall promptly examine each claim for family and medical  leave
insurance benefits and, on the basis of  the facts available, make a decision to allow or deny
the claim. Information furnished in the  claim, as prescribed by the director by rule, must
be accompanied by a written or electronically signed  statement that such information is true
and correct to the best of the individual’s knowledge.
(2)(a) The director shall promptly give notice of a decision to allow or deny a claim.
(b) If the claim is denied, the  written notice must include a statement of the reasons for
denial.
(3) A decision  made under this section is final and the benefits must be paid or denied
accordingly. A covered  individual may request review of the director’s decision as provided
in section 31 of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 14.
Continuous jurisdiction of director; reconsideration of  previous decisions.
(1) The Director of the Employment Department, upon  motion of the director or upon ap-
plication of a covered individual, may at any  time reconsider any final decision under
sections 1 to 51 of this 2019 Act. Reconsideration may occur when there is evidence of:
(a) Errors of computation;
(b) Clerical errors;
(c) Misinformation provided to a party by the Employment Department;
(d) Facts not previously known to the director; or
(e) Errors caused by misapplication of law by the department.
(2) Reconsideration of a final decision shall be made in  accordance with such regulations
as the  director may prescribe, and may include the making of a new decision which, if made,
shall award, deny, terminate, continue, increase or decrease  benefits to the extent found
necessary and  appropriate for the correction of a previous error respecting such benefits.
Any new decision made under this subsection shall be subject to review as  provided in sec-
tion 31 of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 15.
Noncompliance and erroneous payments.  (1) An employer  may not willfully
make or cause to be  made false statements or willfully fail to report a material fact re-
garding the claim of an eligible employee or regarding an  employee’s eligibility for family and
medical leave insurance benefits under sections 1 to 51 of this 2019 Act.
(2) The Director of the Employment Department may assess a civil penalty in an  amount
not to exceed $1,000 against an employer for  each occurrence that violates subsection (1) of
this section.
(3) If the director  determines that a covered individual willfully made a false statement
or willfully failed to report a material fact in order to obtain benefits under sections  1 to 51
of this 2019 Act, the covered individual is:
(a) Disqualified from claiming benefits for one year; and
(b) Liable for a penalty imposed at a rate prescribed by the director of at least 15 percent,
but not greater than 30  percent, of the amount of benefits the individual received to which
the individual was not entitled.
(4) If the director determines that a covered  individual has received benefits to which the
individual was not entitled, the director may:
(a) Seek repayment of benefits from the covered individual  in a manner prescribed by the
director by rule; and
(b) Have the amount  of the benefits deducted from any future benefits otherwise payable
to the individual under section 13 of this 2019 Act.
(5) If benefits are paid because of an error that is not due to provision of a false  state-
ment, nondisclosure of a material fact or misrepresentation by a covered individual, the  di-
rector may waive, in whole or in part, the amount  of any such payments for which recovery
Enrolled House Bill 2005 (HB 2005-B) Page 8
under subsection (4) of this section would  be against equity, good conscience or administra-
tive efficiency.
(6) A decision of the director under this section does  not authorize the recovery of the
amount of any benefits paid to a  covered individual until the decision is final and the decision
specifies:
(a) That the covered individual, by reason  of false statement, nondisclosure or misrep-
resentation, is liable to repay the amount to the Paid  Family and Medical Leave Insurance
Fund established under section 39 of this 2019 Act;
(b) The nature of the false statement, nondisclosure or misrepresentation;
(c) The week or weeks for which the benefits were paid; and
(d) That any amount subject to recovery and any penalty due  under this section may be
collected by the director in a civil action against the employer  or covered individual brought
in the name of the director.
(7) The director shall adopt rules establishing standards and procedures  for the repay-
ment of benefits and payment of penalties and interest under this section.
(8) An employer or covered individual may appeal a determination made under this sec-
tion as provided in section 31 of this 2019 Act.
CONTRIBUTIONS
SECTION 16.
Contributions. (1)(a) Except as otherwise provided in subsections  (3) and (4)
of this section, all employers and eligible employees  shall contribute to the Paid Family and
Medical Leave Insurance Fund established under section 39 of this 2019 Act.
(b) Contributions shall be paid by employers and employees as  a percentage of a total
rate determined by the Director of the Employment Department.
(c) The total rate may not exceed one  percent of employee wages, up to a maximum of
$132,900 in wages.
(2)(a) Employer contributions shall be paid in an amount that is equal to 40 percent  of
the total rate determined by the director.
(b) An employer shall deduct employee contributions  from the wages of each employee
in an amount that is equal to 60 percent of the total rate determined by the director.
(3) When an employment agency is acting as an employer,  the employer contributions
required under this section shall be the responsibility of the employment agency.
(4)(a) Employers that employ fewer than 25 employees are not required to pay the em-
ployer contributions under subsection (1) of this section.
(b) If an employer that employs fewer than 25 employees elects to pay the employer
contributions under subsection (1) of this section, the employer may apply to receive a grant
under section 42 of this 2019 Act.
(5) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, an employer may elect to pay the re-
quired employee contributions, in whole or in part, as an employer-offered benefit.
(6) Subject to section 41 (2) and (3) of this  2019 Act, a self-employed individual who has
elected coverage under section 41 (1) of this 2019  Act shall contribute to the fund, at a rate
that may not exceed one percent of the individual’s taxable income as determined by the di-
rector by rule, for a  period of not less than three years from the date that the election be-
comes effective.
(7) A tribal government that elects coverage under section 41 of this 2019 Act and  em-
ployees of the tribal government shall contribute  to the fund in contribution amounts and
at a rate that may not exceed  one percent of employee wages, up to a maximum of $132,900
in wages, as determined  by the director by rule, for a period of not less than three years
from the date that the election becomes effective.
(8) The director shall set rates for the collection  of payroll contributions consistent with
subsection (1) of this section and in a manner such that:
Enrolled House Bill 2005 (HB 2005-B) Page 9
(a) At the end  of the period for which the rates are effective, the balance of moneys in
the fund is  an amount not less than six months’ worth of projected expenditures from the
fund for performance of the functions and duties of the director under sections 1 to 51 of this
2019 Act; and
(b) The volatility of the contribution rates is minimized.
(9) For purposes  of subsections (1)(c) and (7) of this section, the director shall annually
adjust the maximum amount of employee wages  by the percentage increase, if any, in the
Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers, West Region  (All Items), as published by
the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States Department of Labor, since the date of
the previous determination made under this subsection.
(10) The director shall determine on an annual basis the amount of payroll  contributions,
timing of payroll contributions and maximum employee  contributions sufficient to finance
the costs related to the provisions of sections 1 to 51 of this 2019 Act.
(11) An employer shall  hold any moneys collected under this section in trust for the State
of Oregon and for the payment thereof  to the Department of Revenue in the manner de-
scribed in subsection (12) of this section.
(12)(a) An employer  shall make and file a combined quarterly report of wages earned and
contributions paid under this section on a form prescribed by the Department of Revenue.
(b) The report shall be filed with the Department of Revenue on or before the  last day
of the month following the quarter to which the report relates and  shall be deemed received
on the date of mailing.
(c) The report shall be accompanied by payment of any contributions due  under this
section in a manner determined by the Department of Revenue by rule.
(13) Moneys collected under this section shall be deposited in the Paid Family and Medical
Leave Insurance Fund established under section 39 of this 2019 Act.
(14)(a) If an employer ceases or discontinues operations  or business, or sells out, ex-
changes or otherwise disposes of  the business or stock of goods, any payroll contribution
payable under  this section is immediately due and payable, and the employer shall, within
10 calendar days, pay the payroll contribution due. Any person who becomes a successor in
interest to the business is liable for the full amount of the unpaid payroll contribution.
(b) The director shall adopt rules for compliance with sections 1 to  51 of this 2019 Act
with regard to contributions from an employer’s successor in interest.
(15) Benefits may not be denied to a covered individual solely  because an employer failed
to collect or remit the contributions required under this section.
COLLECTIONS
SECTION 17.
Delinquent contributions and benefit overpayments as liens; foreclosure. (1)
This section applies to:
(a) An employer that fails  to remit to the Department of Revenue any amount of con-
tributions due under section 16 of this 2019 Act;
(b) An individual liable to repay any amount of  benefits paid under sections 1 to 51 of this
2019 Act to which the individual was not entitled; and
(c) A person liable under section 25 of this 2019 Act for amounts  due under sections 1 to
51 of this 2019 Act.
(2) If a judgment or final administrative  order is rendered in favor of the Director of the
Employment Department  for amounts described in subsection (1) of this section, the
amounts shall be a lien in favor  of the director upon all property, whether real or personal,
belonging to the employer, individual or person.
(3) The lien shall be perfected and attach:
Enrolled House Bill 2005 (HB 2005-B) Page 10
(a) To real and personal  property located within the county, upon the recording of a
warrant, as provided in section  19 of this 2019 Act, with the clerk of the county in which the
property is located.
(b) To personal property wherever located within the state, upon:
(A) The recording of a warrant, as provided in section 19 of  this 2019 Act, with the clerk
of any county; and
(B) The filing of a copy of  the warrant with the Secretary of State as provided in section
18 of this 2019 Act.
(4) The lien created by this section may be foreclosed by a suit in the circuit  court in the
manner provided by law for the foreclosure of other liens on real or personal property.
SECTION 18.
Filing warrant attaching lien with Secretary of State. (1) Any warrant at-
taching the  lien under section 17 of this 2019 Act may also be filed in the office of the Sec-
retary of State. Filing in the office of the Secretary of State has no effect until a copy of the
statement of lien or the warrant has been recorded with the county clerk.
(2) When a copy of the statement of lien  or the warrant is filed with the Secretary of
State in compliance with  subsection (1) of this section, such filing shall have the same effect
with respect to personal property as if the copy of the statement of lien or the warrant had
been duly recorded with the county clerk in each county of this state.
(3) A copy of the statement of lien or the warrant filed with  the Secretary of State shall
be filed and indexed by the Secretary of State in the same manner as provided under ORS
79.0501 for the filing and indexing of financing statements.
SECTION 19.
Issuing warrant instead of  bringing civil action; sheriff to proceed on war-
rant. (1) In any case in  which the Director of the Employment Department may bring a civil
action for the collection of amounts liable to be repaid under section 17 of this  2019 Act, in-
terest on those amounts or penalties, the director may instead issue a warrant for  the
amount liable to be repaid with the added interest,  penalties, collection charges and the
sheriff’s costs of executing  the warrant. The Employment Department shall mail or deliver
a copy of the warrant to the last known address of the employer, individual or person.
(2) At any time  after issuing a warrant under this section, the department may record
the warrant in the County Clerk Lien Record of any  county of this state. Recording of the
warrant has the effect described in ORS 205.125.
(3) After recording  a warrant under this section, the director may direct the sheriff of
the county in which the warrant is recorded to levy upon and sell any real and personal
property, and levy upon any currency, belonging to the employer,  individual or person and
found within that county. The proceeds or currency shall  be applied against the amount re-
flected in the warrant and the sheriff’s costs of executing the warrant.
(4) The sheriff shall proceed on the warrant in the same manner prescribed by law for
executions issued against property  pursuant to a judgment and is entitled to the same fees
as provided for executions issued against property pursuant to  a judgment. The fees of the
sheriff shall be added to and collected as a part of the warrant liability.
(5)(a) The director may direct the warrant to any agent and authorize the agent to  col-
lect the amount reflected in the warrant.
(b) In the execution of the warrant the agent has  all of the powers conferred by law upon
sheriffs but is entitled to no fee or compensation  in excess of actual expenses incurred in the
execution.
(6) Amounts collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the Paid  Family and
Medical Leave Insurance Fund established under section 39 of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 20.
Release of lien. (1)(a) The Director of  the Employment Department may
release, compromise or satisfy any lien provided  for in sections 17 and 18 of this 2019 Act
by filing a  notice of release or satisfaction with the county clerk of the county in which the
notice of lien claim was filed.
Enrolled House Bill 2005 (HB 2005-B) Page 11
(b) Upon filing of the notice under this subsection, the property against which  the lien
is claimed shall be released from the lien.
(2) The director may include in the amount received for the  release of the lien any costs
incurred by the director in collecting the amounts due.
(3) Amounts collected  pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the Paid Family and
Medical Leave Insurance Fund established under section 39 of this 2019 Act.
LOCALIZATION
SECTION 21. Where employee’s service performed. An employee’s wages shall be  used
to make determinations under sections 1 to 51  of this 2019 Act if the wages are earned for
service:
(1) Performed entirely within this state; or
(2) Performed both within and outside  this state, but the service performed outside this
state is incidental to the employee’s service within the state.
PENALTIES
SECTION 22.
(1) On or before June 30 of each year, the Director of the Employment
Department shall send a written notice to each employer that has failed to  file all reports
as required by the director or to pay all contributions due under section 16 of this 2019 Act,
warning the employer about the penalty provided in subsection (2) of this section.
(2) If, prior to September 1 of each year, an employer has failed to file  all required re-
ports and pay  all contributions due in that year under section 16 of this 2019 Act, the em-
ployer shall pay a penalty equal to one  percent of the wages of the employer’s employees in
the preceding calendar year.
(3)(a) On or before October 20 of each year,  the director shall assess the penalty provided
in subsection (2) of this section and send  written notification of the assessment to the
employer’s last known address.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, the director  may waive the penalty
for good cause if the employer has filed the required reports and payments.
(4) On or  before November 10 following a penalty assessment under subsection (3) of this
section, the employer that is assessed the penalty may submit a written  request to the di-
rector that the penalty be waived. The request must contain the specific reasons for the
failure to file the required reports or payments prior to September 1.
(5)(a) If the request for waiver of the penalty is denied, the director  shall send written
notification of  the denial to the employer at the employer’s last known address. The decision
denying the request  shall become final unless within 20 days from the date on which the
notification of the decision is sent to the employer,  the employer files a written request for
a hearing that states the reasons for the request.
(b) Hearings, decisions and reconsiderations under this section shall  be conducted in ac-
cordance with rules adopted by the director.
(c) Judicial review of an order assessing a penalty under this section shall be as provided
for review of orders in contested cases under ORS chapter 183, except that  the petition must
be filed within 20 days after the issuance of the order of the director.
(6) The penalty provided in subsection (2) of this section shall be collected in  accordance
with the provisions of sections 17, 18, 19 and 20 of  this 2019 Act, and any amounts collected
pursuant to this subsection  shall be paid to the Paid Family and Medical Leave Insurance
Fund established under section 39 of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 23.
(1) If, upon satisfactory evidence, the Director of the Employment Depart-
ment finds it necessary for the protection of the Paid  Family and Medical Leave Insurance
Fund established under section  39 of this 2019 Act, the director may require any employer
Enrolled House Bill 2005 (HB 2005-B) Page 12
subject to sections 1 to 51 of this  2019 Act, other than the state of Oregon, and every state
officer, board, commission,  department, institution, branch, agency or political subdivision
of this state, to deposit and keep on deposit with the director a sum  equal to the contrib-
utions due or estimated to be due from the employer for a period of three calendar  quarters.
(2)(a) In lieu of a deposit required under subsection  (1) of this section, the director may
accept a bond or an irrevocable letter of credit issued by an  insured institution as defined
in ORS 706.008 in a form acceptable to the director  to secure payment of contributions to
become due to the fund.
(b) The deposit or posting of a bond or letter of credit  under paragraph (a) of this sub-
section shall not relieve the employer of the obligation to make contributions  to the fund as
provided under section 16 of this 2019 Act.
(c) The director may at any time apply any  portion of the deposit, payment on the bond
or the proceeds of the letter of credit to the payment of any amounts  due from the employer
under any provisions of sections 1 to 51 of this 2019 Act.
(3)(a) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, any deposit, bond or letter  of
credit shall be deemed for all purposes to become the sole property of the  director and shall
be deposited in the fund and held for the sole benefit of the fund.
(b) The deposit, bond or letter of credit shall be prior to all other liens, claims  or
encumbrances and shall be exempt from any  process, attachment, garnishment or execution
whatsoever and shall be for the sole benefit of the fund.
(4)(a) If an employer ceases to be an employer subject  to sections 1 to 51 of this 2019 Act,
such sums as are on deposit  in the fund shall first be applied to any amounts due from the
employer to the fund under any provisions of sections 1 to 51 of this 2019 Act.
(b) Only upon  receipt of all payments due to the fund from an employer described in
paragraph (a) of this subsection,  the director shall refund to the employer all deposits re-
maining to the employer’s credit in the fund and shall cancel any bond or letter  of credit
given under this section.
(c) An employer described in paragraph (a) of this subsection shall have no interest  in a
deposit, bond or letter of credit prior to full compliance with this section and  all provisions
of sections 1 to 51 of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 24. (1) If an employer defaults with respect to any amount of contributions
required to be made by the employer  to the Paid Family and Medical Leave Insurance Fund
established under section 39 of this 2019 Act, the unpaid amount, together with interest and
penalties, shall be collected by the Director of the Employment Department in a civil  action
against the employer brought in the name of the director.
(2)(a) Judgment rendered on a civil action brought  under subsection (1) of this section
in favor of the director shall bear interest at the rate provided in subsection (3)  of this sec-
tion.
(b) An employer’s  compliance with the requirements of section 16 of this 2019 Act shall
date from the time that contributions were collected from the employer.
(c) The amount of contributions collected from an employer, together with interest  and
penalties, shall be paid into the fund.
(3)(a) Interest upon any amounts due from an employer shall be paid and collected  at the
rate of one and one-half percent per month from the date  prescribed for the payment to the
fund. In computing the interest, a fraction of a month shall be counted as a full month.
(b) Interest shall be paid at  the same time contributions are required to be paid by the
employer to the fund.
(4) If an employer fails to pay contributions required by section 16 of this 2019 Act at  the
time prescribed by the director, the employer shall be in default.
(5) If an employer that is  in default with respect to payment of contributions fails to
make payment within 10 days after written demand  has been made by the director, the em-
ployer shall be subject to a penalty of 10 percent of the amount of the contributions.  A de-
Enrolled House Bill 2005 (HB 2005-B) Page 13
mand for payment shall be deemed to have been made when deposited in the mail addressed
to the employer at the employer’s last known address of record with the director.
(6) If any part of a deficiency is  due to fraud with intent to avoid payment of contrib-
utions to the fund,  then 50 percent of the total amount of the deficiency, in addition to the
deficiency, shall be assessed, collected and paid, in the same manner as  if it were a defi-
ciency, and deposited in the fund.
(7) Civil actions brought in the name  of the director under this section to collect con-
tributions, interest or penalties from an employer shall  be entitled to preference upon the
calendar over all civil cases that involve only private parties.
(8)(a) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the director may agree to accept
from an employer or former employer with a delinquent account any amount  the director
finds reasonable under the circumstances as consideration in settlement of the full amount
of contributions, interest or penalties due if the director finds that:
(A) The total interest collectible on the delinquent account is in excess of 25 percent of
the principal;
(B) The employer or former employer no longer conducts an  active business and has in-
sufficient net assets to pay the full amount of all contributions, interest or  penalties due;
and
(C) The employer  or former employer can pay some but not all of the delinquent
amounts.
(b) Whenever a  settlement agreement is made pursuant to paragraph (a) of this sub-
section, a written record signed by the director shall be maintained in the files of the direc-
tor. Such records shall set forth:
(A) The name of the employer  or former employer against whom the liability was as-
sessed;
(B) The amount of the assessed liability;
(C) The amount of the liability paid;
(D) The amount of the liability canceled or waived; and
(E) A sworn statement  of the employer or former employer setting forth the complete
financial responsibility of the employer or former employer and  containing a full disclosure
of all matters bearing  upon the ability of the employer or former employer to pay the full
amount of the liability assessed.
(9) The director shall file a full and true copy of  the record of each settlement agreement
with the Secretary of State as a public record.
(10) Any amount agreed to in settlement of the director’s claims on behalf of  the fund
pursuant to subsection (8)(a) of this section  shall be first credited to the contributions due
from the employer or former employer until  the principal amount of contributions due has
been satisfied and shall be deposited in the fund.
SECTION 25.
(1) This section applies to an individual who  is one or more of the following:
(a) An officer or employee of a corporation;
(b) A member or employee of a limited liability company; or
(c) A partner in or employee of a limited liability partnership.
(2) In  the case of default by an employer subject to section 24 of this 2019 Act, an indi-
vidual described in subsection (1) of this section who is under a duty to perform the  actions
required of employers under section 16 of this 2019 Act shall be personally  liable for amounts
due under section 16 of  this 2019 Act. More than one individual may be jointly and severally
liable under this section for amounts due.
(3) If  the Director of the Employment Department determines that an amount is due
under this section, the director shall issue a notice of assessment  to the individual liable
under this section by  mail to the individual’s last known address of record with the director.
Enrolled House Bill 2005 (HB 2005-B) Page 14
(4) If the director  has reason to believe that the individual liable under this section is
insolvent, the director may issue a  jeopardy assessment as provided under section 28 (4) of
this 2019 Act.
(5) Amounts assessed under this section may be reviewed  in the manner provided by
section 28 (5) of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 26. (1) An employer may not willfully refuse or fail to pay a  contribution to the
Paid Family and Medical Leave Insurance Fund established under section 39  of this 2019 Act
or to furnish any report, audit  or information duly required by the Director of the Employ-
ment Department under sections 1 to 51 of this 2019 Act.
(2) An  employer may not make a deduction from the wages of an employee to pay any
portion of the employer contributions due from the employer.
SECTION 27. (1) If an employer fails to file  a combined quarterly report of wages earned
and contributions paid under section 16 of this 2019 Act by the 10th day of the second month
following the end of  the calendar quarter, the Director of the Employment Department, for
the first such failure, shall send to the employer at the employer’s  last known address a
written notice warning  the employer that a subsequent failure to file a report could result
in the imposition of a late filing penalty.
(2) If an employer, without good cause, fails to file a timely report  within the three-year
period immediately following a written warning sent pursuant  to subsection (1) of this sec-
tion, the employer may be assessed a late filing penalty in addition to other amounts due.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (4)  of this section, a penalty assessed under sub-
section (2) of this section shall be 0.02 percent of the wages of  the employer’s employees
rounded to the nearest $100.
(4) A penalty  assessed under subsection (2) of this section for an employer who has no
employees during the calendar quarter to which a quarterly report relates shall be as follows:
(a) $10 for the first report filed late within the three-year period immediately  following
a written notice sent pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.
(b) $25 for the first report filed late within the three-year period immediately following
the assessment of a penalty under subsection (2) of this section.
(c) $50 for the second report filed late within the three-year period immediately following
the assessment of a penalty under subsection (2) of this section.
(d) $100 for the third or subsequent report filed late within  the three-year period imme-
diately following the assessment of a penalty under subsection (2) of this section.
(5)(a) A penalty assessed under this section is final unless, within 20  days after the date
the assessment is mailed to the last known address of the  employer, the employer requests
that the penalty be deleted. The  request must be in writing and state the reason why the
report was filed late.
(b) If the director determines that the employer had good cause for filing  the report late,
the penalty shall be deleted. If it is determined there was not good  cause for filing the report
late, the request for deletion shall be denied.
(6)(a) A determination denying the request for deletion is final unless, within 20 days af-
ter the date the determination is mailed to the  last known address of the employer, the
employer files  a request for hearing. The request for hearing must be in writing and state
the reasons why the determination should not be affirmed.
(b) Judicial review of the determination of  denial shall be as provided for review of orders
in contested cases in ORS chapter 183, except that the request for hearing must be  filed
within 20 days after the issuance of the determination of the director or a designated rep-
resentative.
SECTION 28.
(1)(a) If an employer files a report for the  purpose of determining the
amount of contributions due under section 16 of  this 2019 Act but fails to pay contributions
or interest, the Director of  the Employment Department may assess the amount of con-
tributions or interest due on the basis of the information submitted and shall give written
Enrolled House Bill 2005 (HB 2005-B) Page 15
notice of the assessment to the employer by mail sent to the  employer’s last known address
of record with the director.
(b) Notwithstanding subsection (5) of this section, if the  report is subsequently found to
be incorrect, additional assessments may be made.
(2) If an employer fails to file a report  when required by the director for the purpose of
determining the amount of contributions due under section 16  of this 2019 Act, the director
may make an estimate based upon any information of  the amount of the wages of the
employer’s employees for the period or periods for which no report was filed and  upon the
basis of the estimate shall compute  and assess the amount of contributions payable by the
employer. Written notice of the assessment to the employer shall  be mailed to the
employer’s last known address of record with the director.
(3) If the director is not satisfied with a  report made by an employer for the purpose of
determining the amount of contributions due under section 16  of this 2019 Act, the director
may compute the amount required to be paid upon the  basis of facts contained in the report
or of any information obtainable  and may make an assessment of the amount of the defi-
ciency. Written notice of a deficiency  assessment to the employer shall be mailed to the
employer’s last known address of record with the director.
(4)(a) If the director has reason to believe that an employer  or an individual liable under
section 25 of this 2019 Act is insolvent, or that the collection of any contributions will  be
jeopardized by delaying collection, the director may  make an immediate assessment of the
estimated amount  of accrued contributions, noting upon the assessment that it is a jeopardy
assessment levied under this subsection, and  may proceed to enforce collection immediately.
(b)(A) Interest shall not begin to accrue  on contributions collected under paragraph (a)
of this subsection until the due date.
(B) Court costs may not be  charged against an employer or an individual liable under
section 25 of this 2019 Act on  any action to enforce collection commenced prior to the due
date.
(c) In levying an assessment under  paragraph (a) of this subsection, the director may
demand a bond or deposit of such security as is  necessary to ensure collection of the amount
of the assessment.
(d) Written notice of an assessment to an employer or an individual liable  under section
25 of this 2019 Act shall be mailed to the employer’s  or individual’s last known address of
record with the director.
(5)(a) All assessments provided  for in this section shall finally fix the amount of con-
tributions due and payable unless:
(A) The employer or the  individual liable under section 25 of this 2019 Act applies to the
director for a hearing within 20 days after the mailing of the notice of assessment; or
(B) The director  reviews the assessment prior to a decision of the administrative law
judge pursuant to a hearing.
(b) An employer or person liable under sections 24 and 25 of this 2019 Act that  fails to
apply for a hearing upon an assessment within the time  provided or, having applied, fails to
appear and be heard after due notice of the hearing, is precluded from  raising any defense
to any  action, suit or proceeding brought by the director for the recovery of contributions
based upon the assessment that could have been raised in the hearing.
(c) The amount of contributions assessed under this section  shall be subject to the pen-
alties and interest provided by sections 24 and 25 of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 29. It is  unlawful for an employer to willfully make or cause to be made false
statements or to willfully fail to report a material fact  regarding the claim of an employee
of the employer or regarding an employee’s eligibility for benefits  under sections 1 to 51 of
this 2019 Act.
Enrolled House Bill 2005 (HB 2005-B) Page 16
SECTION 30. (1) In addition to any penalties otherwise prescribed under sections 1 to 51
of this 2019 Act, violation of any provision of sections 1 to 51 of this  2019 Act is a Class A
misdemeanor.
(2) If an offending employer is a corporation, the president, secretary  and the treasurer,
or officers exercising  corresponding functions, are subject to the penalties in this section in
respect to any duties  of which they respectively had knowledge or in the proper exercise of
their duties ought to have had knowledge.
(3) Subject to ORS 153.022, willful violation of sections 1 to 51  of this 2019 Act or of any
order issued or rule adopted  under sections 1 to 51 of this 2019 Act, the violation of which
is made unlawful or the compliance with which is required under sections 1 to 51 of this  2019
Act, and for which a penalty is neither prescribed in  this section nor provided by any other
applicable statute, is a Class C misdemeanor. Each day the violation continues is considered
a separate offense.
APPEALS
SECTION 31.
Generally. (1) The Director of the Employment Department shall establish
a process by which:
(a) An employer may request a hearing to  obtain review of a final decision of the director
regarding approval or denial of an employer’s application  for approval of a plan under section
43 of this 2019 Act.
(b) A covered individual may request a hearing to  obtain review of a final decision of the
director regarding:
(A) Approval or denial of a claim submitted to the director for payment of  family and
medical leave insurance benefits;
(B) The weekly benefit amount payable to a covered individual  as determined under sec-
tion 7 of this 2019 Act; or
(C) Disqualification from the receipt  of benefits including liability or repayment of bene-
fits as determined under section 15 of this 2019 Act.
(2) Notwithstanding ORS 183.315,  the process established by the director under this sec-
tion shall comply with  provisions for a contested case under ORS chapter 183 and is subject
to judicial review as provided in ORS 183.482.
SECTION 32. Appeals of decisions under equivalent employer  plan. The Director of the
Employment Department shall establish by  rule a method to resolve disputes between em-
ployers and employees concerning coverage and benefits provided under a plan approved un-
der section 43 of this 2019 Act.
ADMINISTRATION
SECTION 33.
Family and medical leave insurance program; administration of program.
(1) The Director of the Employment Department shall establish a family and  medical leave
insurance program to provide family and medical leave insurance benefits to a  covered indi-
vidual as specified in sections 1 to 51 of this 2019 Act.
(2) Not later than September 1, 2021, the director shall adopt  rules that are necessary
to establish the program under subsection (1) of this section, including but not  limited to
rules that:
(a) Establish an outreach plan for the program  to receive input from, and disseminate
information to, employers and eligible employees.
(b) Establish a  process by which employers may apply for approval of an employer-offered
benefit plan under section 43 of this 2019 Act.
(c) Establish alternatives by which an employer may determine a  benefit year period,
including on a calendar year and noncalendar year basis.
Enrolled House Bill 2005 (HB 2005-B) Page 17
(3) The director may  enter into interagency agreements to perform the duties and func-
tions necessary to implement and administer sections 1 to 51 of this 2019 Act.
(4) Whenever possible, the director shall use existing employer and  public infrastructure
to maintain records, conduct outreach and facilitate contributions made to the program.
(5) All agencies of state government, as defined in ORS  174.111, shall, upon request of the
director, assist in the performance of the director’s duties under sections 1 to 51 of this 2019
Act, including but not limited to outreach, technical assistance and training.
SECTION 34.
Agreements with third party. (1) The Director of the Employment Depart-
ment may enter  into an agreement with a third party to implement sections 1 to 51 of this
2019 Act and to serve as  the administrator of the program established under section 33 of
this 2019 Act. The director may enter into such an  agreement only on a competitive bid ba-
sis.
(2) Every service provided by a third party administrator pursuant to an  agreement en-
tered into under this section is  subject to the same requirements provided under sections 1
to 51 of this 2019 Act as if the services had been provided by the director.
(3) A third party administrator that enters into an agreement  with the director under
this section is subject to oversight by the director.
(4) Costs incurred by the director pursuant to an agreement with a third  party adminis-
trator entered into under this section may not be recovered by an  increase in the contrib-
ution rate determined by the director under section 16 of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 35. Counting employees. (1) Subject to subsection (2) of this section, for pur-
poses of sections 10  and 16 of this 2019 Act, the Director of the Employment Department
shall establish by rule a method to determine  on an annual basis the number of employees
employed by an employer. The method shall require that the  determination be based on the
average number of employees employed by the employer in  the 12-month period immediately
preceding the date on which the determination is made.
(2) A replacement worker who is hired to temporarily replace an  eligible employee during
a period of family leave, medical leave or safe leave shall not be counted as an employee for
purposes of determining the number of employees employed by an employer.
SECTION 36.
Advisory committee. (1) The Director of the Employment Department shall
establish an advisory committee to review issues related to the implementation  and admin-
istration of the family and medical leave insurance program established under section 33  of
this 2019 Act and rulemaking related to the program.
(2)(a) The advisory committee  shall consist of nine members appointed by the director
as follows:
(A) A representative of the Employment Department.
(B) Four members who represent employees.
(C) Four  members who represent employers, at least one of whom represents employers
that employ fewer than 25 employees.
(b) Members shall serve for a term of two years and may be reappointed. If there  is a
vacancy for any cause, the director  shall make an appointment to become immediately ef-
fective for the unexpired term.
(c) The representative of  the department shall serve as chairperson of the advisory
committee.
(3) The advisory committee shall advise and make recommendations  to the director re-
garding issues related to the program, including but not limited to:
(a) Implementation;
(b) Administration; and
(c) Rulemaking.
(4) Members of the advisory committee are not entitled to compensation  but may be re-
imbursed for actual and  necessary travel or other expenses incurred in the performance of
Enrolled House Bill 2005 (HB 2005-B) Page 18
their official  duties. The director shall pay the expenses out of funds appropriated to the
department under section 59 of this 2019 Act.
(5) All agencies  of state government, as defined in ORS 174.111, are directed to assist the
advisory committee in the performance of the duties of the advisory committee and, to  the
extent permitted by laws  relating to confidentiality, to furnish information and advice that
the members of the advisory committee consider necessary to perform their duties.
SECTION 37. Records of  employers; inspections. (1) All employers shall maintain payroll
records, including account records that document employee contributions and expenses,  and
employment records that reflect the total hours worked by all employees and the  amount
of leave taken  by employees under sections 1 to 51 of this 2019 Act for the current calendar
year and the three prior calendar years.
(2) The Director of the Employment Department may inspect the payroll and employment
records of employers for the purpose of administering sections 1 to 51 of this 2019  Act. Em-
ployers must provide the director with all pertinent payroll and employment records  upon
request.
(3) When an employment agency is acting as an employer, the requirements under sub-
sections (1) and (2) of this section shall be the responsibility of the employment agency.
SECTION 38. Confidentiality. (1) All information in the records of the Employment De-
partment or a third party administrator pertaining to the administration of  sections 1 to 51
of this 2019 Act:
(a) Is  confidential and for the exclusive use and information of the Director of the Em-
ployment Department in administering sections 1 to 51 of this 2019 Act;
(b) May not be used in any  court action or in any proceeding pending in the court unless
the director or the State of Oregon is a party to the action or proceeding or unless the action
or proceeding concerns the establishment, enforcement or modification  of a support obli-
gation and support services  are being provided by the Division of Child Support of the De-
partment of Justice or the district attorney pursuant to ORS 25.080; and
(c) Is exempt from disclosure under ORS 192.311 to 192.478.
(2) At the discretion of the director and subject to an interagency  agreement, the direc-
tor may disclose information to a public official in the performance  of the public official’s
official duties administering or enforcing laws within the  public official’s authority and to
an agent or contractor of a public official. The public official shall agree to assume  respon-
sibility for misuse of the information by the public official’s agent or contractor.
(3) At the discretion of the director, the director may disclose information to a  contrac-
tor pursuant to a contract  for actuarial services. The contractor shall agree to assume re-
sponsibility for misuse of the information by the contractor’s agent.
(4) At the  discretion of the director, the director may disclose information to an em-
ployee or officer within any division of the  department as necessary to conduct research,
compile aggregate data from the information received and any other purpose  deemed neces-
sary by  the director to assist the director in carrying out the duties under sections 1 to 51
of this 2019 Act or other duties under ORS chapter 657.
SECTION 39.
Paid Family and Medical Leave  Insurance Fund. (1) The Paid Family and
Medical Leave Insurance Fund is established in the State Treasury, separate and  distinct
from the  General Fund. The Paid Family and Medical Leave Insurance Fund is declared to
be a trust fund.
(2) The fund consists of moneys deposited in the  fund from contributions made under
section 16 of this 2019  Act and from penalties, fees, revenues and all other amounts deposited
in or credited to the fund. Interest earned by the fund shall be credited to the fund.
(3) Moneys in the fund are continuously  appropriated to the Director of the Employment
Department and may be used solely to  carry out the purposes set forth in sections 1 to 51
of this 2019 Act, including the payment  of administrative costs and expenses that the direc-
tor incurs in carrying out the provisions of sections 1 to 51 of this 2019 Act.
Enrolled House Bill 2005 (HB 2005-B) Page 19
SECTION 40. State agencies to assist with outreach, technical assistance and compliance
services. The Director of the  Employment Department may enter into intergovernmental
agreements under ORS chapter 190 with the Department of Revenue, the Department of
Consumer and Business Services, the Bureau of Labor and  Industries and any other agency
to provide outreach, technical assistance or compliance services related to  sections 1 to 51
of this 2019 Act on behalf of the director.
ELECTIVE COVERAGE
SECTION 41.
(1) Except as provided  in subsections (2) and (3) of this section, a self-
employed individual may elect to be covered under  sections 1 to 51 of this 2019 Act for a
period of not less than three  years. The self-employed individual must file a notice of election
in writing with the Director  of the Employment Department and contribute to the Paid
Family and Medical Leave Insurance Fund established  under section 39 of this 2019 Act in
the manner prescribed by the director by rule.  The election becomes effective on the date
the notice is filed.  The self-employed individual must agree to supply any information con-
cerning taxable income that the director deems necessary.
(2) Subject to section 16 of this 2019 Act, a  self-employed individual who has elected
coverage may terminate coverage by filing written notice with the director at  such times as
the director prescribes by  rule, including at the time of a change in the self-employed
individual’s employment status. The termination  may not take effect sooner than 30 days
after the notice is filed.
(3) A self-employed individual who has  elected coverage may terminate coverage on the
date of filing of a  voluntary or involuntary bankruptcy petition. The self-employed
individual’s elective coverage terminates  on the date on which the self-employed individual
provides to the director documentation to support  the self-employed individual’s filing of the
bankruptcy petition and files written notice with  the director. At any time thereafter, the
self-employed individual may re-elect coverage under this section.
(4) A tribal government may elect to be covered under sections 1  to 51 of this 2019 Act,
or to terminate coverage, in the same manner as provided in subsections (1)  to (3) of this
section.
(5) The director shall prescribe  by rule the method for collecting contributions and er-
roneous payments of benefits from self-employed individuals, tribal governments and tribal
government employees.
EMPLOYER ASSISTANCE
SECTION 42.
Employer assistance. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this sec-
tion, employers that employ fewer than  25 employees and that make the required contrib-
utions under section 16 of this 2019 Act may  apply to the Employment Department to receive
one of the following grants:
(a) If the employer hires a temporary worker to replace an eligible employee who takes
family leave, medical  leave or safe leave for a period of seven or more days, a grant of up
to $3,000 to apply toward the costs of hiring the worker.
(b) A grant of up to $1,000 as reimbursement for significant additional wage-related  costs
incurred during a period in which an eligible employee takes leave described under paragraph
(a) of this subsection.
(2) In addition to a grant received under subsection (1)(b) of  this section, an employer
may receive a grant in the amount of  the difference between the grant awarded and $3,000
if:
Enrolled House Bill 2005 (HB 2005-B) Page 20
(a) After  the commencement of a period of family leave, medical leave or safe leave taken
by an  eligible employee, the employee extends the period of leave beyond the employee’s ini-
tial expected period of leave; and
(b) The employer hired a temporary worker to replace the eligible employee during  the
employee’s period of leave.
(3) An employer may apply for a grant under subsection (1) of this  section not more than
10 times per calendar  year and not more than once for each eligible employee who takes
leave under section 4 of this 2019 Act.
(4) To be eligible for a grant under this  section, an employer shall provide to the Director
of the Employment Department written documentation showing that the  employer hired a
temporary worker or that  the wage-related costs incurred are due to an eligible employee’s
use of family leave, medical leave or safe leave.
(5) The grants awarded under this section shall be funded with moneys in the Paid Family
and Medical Leave Insurance Fund established under section 39 of this 2019 Act.
(6) The director shall adopt any rules necessary to implement this section.
EQUIVALENT PLANS
SECTION 43. Equivalent plans, generally. (1)(a) An employer  may apply to the Director
of the Employment Department for approval of an employer-offered benefit plan that pro-
vides family and medical leave insurance benefits to the employer’s employees.
(b) An employer that seeks approval of a plan  shall submit an application to the director
in the form and manner  prescribed by the director by rule, accompanied by an application
fee not to exceed $250.
(2) The  director shall review and approve an application for a plan if the director finds
that:
(a) The plan is made available to all employees who have been continuously  employed
with an employer for 30 days.
(b) The benefits afforded to employees covered under the plan are equal  to or greater
than the weekly benefits and the duration of leave  that an eligible employee would qualify
for under sections 1 to 51 of this 2019 Act.
(3) An employer may make  a plan available to employees who have been employed by the
employer for less than 30 days but in no event may an employer require  an employee to have
been employed by the employer for more than 30 days to be eligible for coverage under  the
plan.
(4) Neither an  employer that provides benefits under an approved plan nor an employee
covered under such a plan is required to make  the contributions under section 16 of this 2019
Act.
(5)(a) An employer  may assume all or a part of the costs related to a plan approved under
this section.
(b) If an  employer assumes only part of the costs, the employer may deduct employee
contributions from the wages of employees to finance the costs related to the  plan, except
that any contribution amounts deducted may not exceed the amount that an eligible em-
ployee would otherwise be required to contribute under section 16 of this 2019 Act.
(c) Employee contributions received or retained by an employer under this  subsection
must be used for plan expenses and are not  considered to be a part of an employer’s assets
for any purpose.
(6) Any paid sick leave earned under ORS 653.606 is in  addition to the benefits made
available under a plan that has been approved under this section.
(7) An employee who takes leave pursuant to a plan approved under this section  shall
provide notice to an employer of such leave in the same manner as  provided in section 9 of
this 2019 Act.
Enrolled House Bill 2005 (HB 2005-B) Page 21
(8) A plan  approved under this section shall remain in effect for a period of not less than
one year.
(9) Nothing in  this section prohibits an employee who is otherwise eligible from applying
for coverage under the program established under section 33 of this 2019 Act or under  a
separate employer-offered plan that has been approved under this section.
(10) The director shall adopt rules:
(a) To prevent the payment of  benefits in excess of 100 percent of an eligible employee’s
average weekly wage to an employee who is simultaneously covered under  more than one
employer-offered plan or who has additional coverage under the  program established under
section 33 of this 2019 Act; and
(b) That require that  the benefits made available to an eligible employee who is covered
under more than one plan shall be prorated under each respective plan.
(11) An employer that offers a plan approved under this section shall:
(a) Be subject to the same requirements provided in sections 10 and 11 of this 2019 Act;
(b) Maintain  all reports, information and records relating to the plan, including payroll
and account records that document employee contributions and expenses, in the manner
established by the director by rule; and
(c) Provide written notice to employees that includes:
(A) Information  about benefits available under the approved plan, including the duration
of leave;
(B) The process for filing a claim to receive benefits under the plan;
(C) The process for employee deductions used to finance the costs of the plan, if any;
(D) An employee’s right to dispute a benefit determination in the manner determined  by
the director under section 32 of this 2019 Act;
(E) The right to job protection and benefits continuation, if applicable; and
(F) A statement that discrimination  and retaliatory personnel actions against an em-
ployee for inquiring about the family and medical leave insurance program established under
section 33 of this 2019 Act, giving notification of  leave under the program, taking leave under
the program or claiming family and medical leave insurance benefits are prohibited.
(12) Benefits received under this section are considered wages for  purposes of a wage
claim under ORS chapter 652.
(13) An employer whose application for plan approval was denied by  the director under
this section or terminated by  the director under section 44 of this 2019 Act may request re-
view of the decision as provided in section 31 of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 44.
Equivalent plans - termination.  (1)(a) At  such times as may be established
by the Director of the Employment Department by rule, the director  shall review the family
and medical leave insurance benefits provided  under a plan that has been approved under
section 43 of this 2019 Act.
(b) Based on the review, the director shall determine whether the approved  plan provides
benefits that are equal to or greater than the benefits that would be available to eligible
employees under the family  and medical leave insurance program established under section
33 of this 2019 Act.
(2) If the director determines that the approved plan does not provide benefits in com-
pliance with requirements under section 43  (2) of this 2019 Act, the director shall terminate
the plan and the employer shall be required to make  employer contributions and deduct
employee contributions in accordance with section 16 of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 45.
Equivalent plans - reapproval.  (1) Except as provided in  section 46 of this
2019 Act, an employer  shall resubmit an application to the Director of the Employment De-
partment for reapproval of a plan that was approved under section 43 of this 2019 Act.  An
employer shall apply  for reapproval once a year for a three-year period following the date
on which the director first approved the plan.
Enrolled House Bill 2005 (HB 2005-B) Page 22
(2) Unless an employer  has made changes to a plan that were not considered by the di-
rector in a previously approved or  reapproved application, an employer need not submit an
application for reapproval of the plan after expiration of the three-year  period described in
subsection (1) of this section.
SECTION 46. Equivalent plans - Withdrawal.  (1) An employer may elect to withdraw from
a plan that was approved under  section 43 of this 2019 Act in the manner specified by the
Director of the Employment Department by rule provided  that the plan has been in effect
for at least one year.
(2) If an employer elects to withdraw  from an approved plan, any deductions made from
the wages of an employee that remain in possession of the employer  upon the employer’s
withdrawal of the plan shall be disposed of as determined by the director.
SECTION 47. Equivalent plans - Gap coverage. (1) An employee who is a covered indi-
vidual under the program established under section 33 of this 2019 Act retains such status
until the employee qualifies for coverage under a plan  approved under section 43 of this 2019
Act.
(2)(a) An employee who has ceased  to be covered by a plan approved under section 43 of
this 2019 Act, is,  if otherwise eligible, automatically qualified to receive family and medical
leave insurance benefits under the program established under section 33 of this 2019 Act.
(b) Notwithstanding section 43 (3) of this 2019 Act, an employee who was eligible for
benefits under a plan approved under section 43 of this 2019 Act is automatically  eligible for
benefits under a plan that is offered by a new employer and that has been  approved under
section 43 of this 2019 Act.
(c) For purposes of this subsection, an employee has ceased  to be covered by an approved
plan if:
(A) The employee takes family leave, medical leave  or safe leave after the employee has
separated from employment with  an employer that offered a plan approved under section 43
of this 2019 Act;
(B) The employer has withdrawn from the plan as provided under section  46 of this 2019
Act;
(C) The Director of the Employment Department has terminated  the plan under section
44 of this 2019 Act; or
(D) The director finds that the employer  is insolvent or has discontinued doing business
in this state.
SECTION 48. Equivalent plans - Successors  in interest to employers. (1) Except as pro-
vided in subsection (2) of  this section, a plan that has been approved under section 43 of this
2019 Act and that is in effect at the time a successor in interest acquires the organization,
trade or business, or substantially all assets of the  organization, trade or business or a dis-
tinct and severable portion of the organization, trade or business, and continues its operation
without substantial reduction of personnel resulting from the acquisition, must continue  to
be offered to eligible employees and the successor in interest may not withdraw  the plan
without a specific request for withdrawal in a manner prescribed by the Director of the
Employment Department by rule.
(2) Within 90 days  following the date of an acquisition described in subsection (1) of this
section, a successor in interest to an  employer may terminate a plan that was approved
under section 43 of this  2019 Act and that was in effect on the date of acquisition without a
request to withdraw the plan, provided the successor in interest  provides notice to the di-
rector and all employees of the employer in a manner prescribed by the director by rule.
COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENTS
Enrolled House Bill 2005 (HB 2005-B) Page 23
SECTION 49. Collective Bargaining Agreements. Nothing in sections 1 to 51 of this 2019
Act requires the  reopening or renegotiation of a collective bargaining agreement entered into
before the effective date of this 2019 Act prior to the date on which the agreement expires.
SECTION 49a. Minimum requirements.  Sections 1 to 51 of this 2019 Act  establish mini-
mum requirements pertaining to family leave, medical leave and safe leave and  may not be
construed to preempt, limit or otherwise  diminish the applicability of any employer policy,
standard or collective bargaining agreement that provides for greater  use of family leave,
medical leave or safe leave under state or federal law.
REPORTS AND REVIEWS
SECTION 50. Department review of equivalent plans. Beginning January 1, 2023, and not
more than once each year for three consecutive calendar years thereafter, the Director of
the Employment Department shall conduct a review of  the expenses incurred by the Em-
ployment Department in reviewing plans for approval under section 43  of this 2019 Act, in-
cluding an analysis of adequacy of the  application fee determined by the department and
administrative expenses related to request for review of determinations regarding  approval
or denial of applications as provided under section 31 of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 51.
Reports. (1)(a) The Director of the Employment Department  shall submit
to the interim  committees of the Legislative Assembly related to workforce or business and
labor, in the manner provided in  ORS 192.245, reports summarizing the Employment
Department’s progress toward implementing  the family and medical leave insurance program
described in sections 1 to 51 of this 2019 Act.
(b) The director shall  submit the first report not later than February 15, 2020, and a
second report not later than September 1, 2021.
(2) Beginning on July 1, 2023, and once during each of the following  three consecutive
biennia, the director shall, to the extent that the director has acquired the information,
submit to the interim committees of the  Legislative Assembly related to workforce or busi-
ness and labor, in the manner provided in ORS 192.245, a report that includes:
(a) The total number of claims submitted under section 12 of this 2019 Act.
(b) The number of claims allowed under section  13 of this 2019 Act and the number of
claims denied under section 13 of this 2019 Act.
(c) The total amount of benefits paid out  of the Paid Family and Medical Leave Insurance
Fund established under section 39 of this 2019 Act.
(d) Data regarding  the use of moneys in the fund, the solvency of the fund and the bal-
ance of the fund.
(e) The amount of contributions collected under section 16 of this 2019 Act.
(f) The number of applications for plan approval submitted under section 43 of  this 2019
Act, including the number of plans approved and the costs  the department incurred in re-
viewing such applications.
(g) The number of applications received  by the department for employer assistance and
the total amounts awarded in grants under section 42 of this 2019 Act.
(h) The director shall include in the reports described in this  subsection any recommen-
dations made by the advisory committee under section 36 of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 52.
 ORS 410.619 is amended to read:
410.619. (1) A home care worker who is  not otherwise employed by the Home Care Commission,
the Department of Human Services, the Oregon Health Authority,  an area agency or a support
services brokerage shall not be deemed to be an  employee of the state, whether or not the state
selects the home  care worker for employment or exercises any direction or control over the home
care worker, for the purpose of the state’s liability for the home care worker’s actions.
(2) The state shall be deemed an employer of home care workers for the purposes of:
(a) ORS 410.605, 410.606, 410.612 and 410.614 and sections 1 to 51 of this 2019 Act ; and
Enrolled House Bill 2005 (HB 2005-B) Page 24
(b) ORS chapter 657, except as provided in ORS 657.730 (4).
SECTION 53.
 ORS 410.619, as amended by section  17, chapter 75, Oregon Laws 2018, is
amended to read:
410.619. (1) A home care worker or personal support worker who is  not otherwise employed by
the Home Care Commission, the Department of Human Services,  the Oregon Health Authority, an
area agency or a support services brokerage shall not be deemed to be an employee of the state,
whether or not the state selects  the home care worker or personal support worker for employment
or exercises any direction or control over the home care  worker or personal support worker, for the
purpose of the state’s liability for the actions of the home care worker or personal support  worker.
(2) The state shall be deemed an employer  of home care workers or personal support workers
for the purposes of:
(a) ORS 410.605, 410.606, 410.612 and 410.614 and sections 1 to 51 of this 2019 Act ; and
(b) ORS chapter 657, except as provided in ORS 657.730 (4).
SECTION 54.
 ORS 657.100 is amended to read:
657.100. (1) An individual is deemed “unemployed”  in any week during which the individual
performs no services and with respect to which no remuneration for services  performed is paid or
payable to the individual, or in any week of less than  full-time work if the remuneration paid or
payable to the individual for services performed during the week is  less than the individual’s weekly
benefit amount.
(2) For  the purposes of ORS 657.155 (1), an individual who performs full-time services in any
week for an employing unit is not  unemployed even though remuneration is neither paid nor payable
to the individual for the  services performed; however, nothing in this subsection shall prevent an
individual from meeting the definition of “unemployed”  as used in this section solely by reason of
the individual’s performance of volunteer services without remuneration for a charitable institution
or a governmental entity.
(3) An individual may not be deemed “unemployed” under  this section for any week in
which the individual is receiving family and medical leave insurance benefits under sections
1 to 51 of this 2019 Act.
[(3)] (4) The Director of the Employment Department shall prescribe rules as the  director deems
necessary with respect to the various types of unemployment.
SECTION 55.
 ORS 657.471 is amended to read:
657.471. (1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, benefits paid to  an eligible individual
shall be charged to each of the individual’s employers during the  base year in the same proportion
that the  wages paid by each employer to the individual during the base year bear to the wages paid
by all employers to that individual during that year.
(2) The account of an employer, other than a  political subdivision electing to pay taxes under
ORS 657.509, may not  be charged with benefits paid an unemployed individual in excess of one-third
of the base year wages paid that individual while in the employ of the employer.
(3) Benefits paid to an individual  for unemployment immediately after the expiration of a period
of disqualification for having left the employment of an employer voluntarily without  good cause
may not be charged to the employer.
(4) Benefits paid to an individual  for unemployment immediately after the expiration of a period
of disqualification for having been discharged by an employer for misconduct may not be  charged
to the employer.
(5) Benefits paid without any disqualification to an individual may not be charged  to an em-
ployer of the individual for the immediate period of unemployment if:
(a) The individual left the employment of the employer voluntarily for good cause  not attribut-
able to the employer; or
(b) The employer discharged the individual because the individual was unable to satisfy a job
prerequisite required by law or administrative rule.
(6) If it is determined under the provisions of subsection (3), (4) or (5) of this  section that ben-
efits paid  to an individual may not be charged to an employer, the employer’s account may not be
Enrolled House Bill 2005 (HB 2005-B) Page 25
charged for any benefits  paid for any subsequent period or periods of unemployment during the
individual’s affected benefit year or during any benefit year beginning within 52 weeks  subsequent
to the affected benefit year.
(7)(a) A base-year employer that  is not otherwise eligible for relief of charges for benefits under
this section and that receives notification  of an initial valid determination of a claim may request
relief of charges if the claim is made by an individual who:
(A) Left the employment  of the employer voluntarily and not for reasons attributable to the
employer;
(B) Was disqualified for the individual’s most recent separation from the employer  by a deter-
mination of the Director  of the Employment Department that the individual has been discharged for
misconduct connected with the employment for the employer; or
(C) Was discharged for reasons that would be disqualifying under ORS 657.176 (2)(a), (b), (f),  (g)
or (h).
(b)(A) A request under paragraph (a)(A) of this subsection:
(i) Must advise the director in writing of  the date on which the individual left employment, state
that the individual left voluntarily and  not for reasons attributable to the employer and give the
reason for which the individual left employment.
(ii) May not be granted if the individual was reemployed by the employer  prior to the filing of
the initial valid claim.
(B) A request under paragraph (a)(C) of this subsection must specify the  date of the discharge
and the reasons why the employer believes  the discharge was for reasons that would be disqualify-
ing under ORS 657.176 (2)(a), (b), (f), (g) or (h).
(c) A request for relief under this subsection must be sent to the department within 30 days after
the date on which the notice provided for under ORS 657.266 is mailed or  delivered to the employer.
(d) Upon receipt of the request from the employer,  the director shall review the information
provided by the employer and determine  whether the employer is entitled to relief of charges for
benefits paid to the individual during the benefit year. If the director determines that the  employer
is entitled to relief of charges, the director shall grant the relief.
(e)(A) The determination of the director under paragraph (a)(A) and (C) of this subsection is final
in all cases unless an application for hearing is filed  within 20 days after delivery of the determi-
nation, or, if mailed, within 20 days after the determination was mailed  to the employer’s last-known
address.
(B) When a request for hearing has been timely filed, an administrative  law judge shall be as-
signed to conduct a hearing.
(C) After the  administrative law judge has afforded all parties an opportunity for a fair hearing,
the administrative law judge shall affirm or reverse the determination and promptly notify all par-
ties entitled to notice of the decision and the reasons for the decision.
(D) Decisions of the administrative law judge under this subsection are final and may be
judicially reviewed as provided in ORS 657.684 to the extent applicable.
(8)(a) If the director finds that  an employer or the employer’s agent, in submitting facts under
subsection (7) of this section, willfully makes a false statement or representation or willfully  fails
to report a material fact concerning the termination of an individual’s employment, the director
shall make a determination charging the employer’s reserve account not less than  two nor more
than 10 times the weekly benefit amount of the claimant or claimants.
(b) The director shall give notice  to the employer of the determination under this subsection and
the determination of the director is final unless  an application for hearing is filed in the manner
provided for in subsection (7)(e) of this section.
(9) Benefits paid to an individual may not be charged to a base-year employer if:
(a) The employer furnished part-time work to the individual during the base year;
(b) The individual has become eligible for benefits because of loss of employment with one or
more other employers;
Enrolled House Bill 2005 (HB 2005-B) Page 26
(c) The employer has continued to furnish part-time work to  the individual in substantially the
same amount as during the individual’s base year; and
(d) The employer requests relief of charges within 30 days of  the date the notice provided for
in ORS 657.266 is mailed or delivered to the employer.
(10) Benefits paid to an individual for unemployment due  to the return of a covered in-
dividual, as defined in section  2 of this 2019 Act, who was temporarily replaced by the indi-
vidual for a period of family leave, medical leave or safe leave under  sections 1 to 51 of this
2019 Act may not be charged to the employer of the covered individual.
[(10)] (11) Notwithstanding any other provision  of this section, benefits paid to an individual
shall be charged to an employer’s account if:
(a) The employer or the employer’s agent fails to  respond timely or adequately to a request from
the Employment Department for information relating to the claim for benefits;
(b) The failure to respond causes an overpayment of benefits to the claimant; and
(c) The employer or the employer’s agent has a pattern of failing to respond timely or  ade-
quately to requests from the department for information relating to claims for benefits.
SECTION 56.
 ORS 659A.162 is amended to read:
659A.162. (1) Except as specifically provided by  ORS 659A.150 to 659A.186 and section 4 of this
2019 Act , an eligible employee is entitled to up to a total of 12 weeks  of family leave within any
one-year period.
(2)(a) Except as provided by paragraph (b) of this subsection, an eligible  employee is entitled to
a total of two weeks of family leave for the purposes described in ORS 659A.159 (1)(e).
(b) An eligible employee is entitled to the  period of leave described in paragraph (a) of this
subsection upon the death  of each family member of the employee within any one-year period, except
that leave taken  as provided by this subsection may not exceed the total period of family leave au-
thorized by subsection (1) of this section.
(c) A covered employer may not require an eligible employee to take multiple periods of leave
described in ORS 659A.159 (1)(e) concurrently if more than one family  member of the employee dies
during the one-year period.
(d) All leave taken for the purposes described in ORS 659A.159 (1)(e)  shall be counted toward
the total period of family leave authorized by subsection (1) of this section.
(3)(a) In addition to the 12 weeks of family leave authorized by  subsection (1) of this section, a
female eligible employee may take a total of 12 weeks of leave within any one-year period for  an
illness, injury or condition related to pregnancy or childbirth that  disables the eligible employee
from performing any available job duties offered by the covered employer.
(b) An eligible  employee who takes 12 weeks of family leave within a one-year period for the
purpose specified in ORS 659A.159 (1)(a) may take up to an additional 12 weeks of leave within  the
one-year period for the purpose specified in ORS 659A.159 (1)(d).
(4) When two or more family members work for the same covered employer,  the eligible em-
ployees may not take concurrent family leave unless:
(a) One employee needs to care  for another employee who is a family member and who is suf-
fering from a serious health condition;
(b) One employee needs to care for a child who has a serious  health condition while another
employee who is a family member is also suffering from a serious health condition; or
(c) The employees are taking leave described in ORS 659A.159 (1)(e).
(5) An eligible employee may take family leave for the purpose specified in ORS 659A.159 (1)(a)
in two or more nonconsecutive periods of leave only with the approval of the employer.
(6) Leave need not be provided to an eligible employee by a covered employer for the purpose
specified in ORS 659A.159 (1)(d) if another family member is available to care for the child.
(7) A covered employer may not reduce the amount  of family leave available to an eligible em-
ployee under this section by any period the  employee is unable to work because of a disabling
compensable injury.
Enrolled House Bill 2005 (HB 2005-B) Page 27
(8)(a) The Commissioner of the Bureau of  Labor and Industries shall adopt rules governing when
family leave for a serious health condition of an eligible  employee or a family member of the eligible
employee may be taken intermittently or by working a reduced workweek.  Rules adopted by the
commissioner under this paragraph shall allow taking of family leave  on an intermittent basis or
by use of a reduced workweek to the extent permitted by federal law and to the extent that  taking
family leave on an  intermittent basis or by use of a reduced workweek does not result in the loss
of an eligible employee’s exempt status under the federal Fair Labor Standards Act.
(b) The commissioner shall adopt rules governing when family  leave for the purposes described
in ORS 659A.159 (1)(e) may be taken to the extent permitted by federal law  and to the extent that
taking family leave on an intermittent basis does not result in the loss of an eligible  employee’s
exempt status under the federal Fair Labor Standards Act.
SECTION 57.  ORS 659A.885, as amended by section 9, chapter 197, Oregon  Laws 2017, and
section 13, chapter 691, Oregon Laws 2017, is amended to read:
659A.885. (1) Any person claiming to be aggrieved by an  unlawful practice specified in sub-
section (2) of this section may  file a civil action in circuit court. In any action under this subsection,
the court may order injunctive relief  and any other equitable relief that may be appropriate, in-
cluding but not  limited to reinstatement or the hiring of employees with or without back pay. A
court may order back pay in an action under this subsection only for the two-year period  imme-
diately preceding the  filing of a complaint under ORS 659A.820 with the Commissioner of the Bureau
of Labor and Industries, or if a complaint was not filed before the action was  commenced, the two-
year period immediately preceding the filing of  the action. In any action under this subsection, the
court may allow the prevailing party costs and reasonable attorney fees at trial and on appeal. Ex-
cept as provided in subsection (3) of this section:
(a) The judge shall determine the facts in an action under this subsection; and
(b) Upon any appeal of a judgment in an action under this subsection, the appellate court shall
review the judgment pursuant to the standard established by ORS 19.415 (3).
(2) An action may be brought under subsection (1) of this section alleging a violation of:
(a) ORS 10.090, 10.092, 25.337, 25.424, 171.120, 408.230, 408.237 (2), 475B.281, 476.574, 652.020,
652.220, 652.355, 653.060, 653.263, 653.265,  653.547, 653.549, 653.601 to 653.661, 659.852, 659A.030,
659A.040, 659A.043, 659A.046, 659A.063, 659A.069, 659A.082, 659A.088, 659A.103 to 659A.145,
659A.150 to 659A.186, 659A.194, 659A.199, 659A.203, 659A.218, 659A.228, 659A.230, 659A.233,
659A.236, 659A.250 to 659A.262, 659A.277, 659A.290, 659A.300, 659A.306, 659A.309, 659A.315,
659A.318, 659A.320, 659A.355 or 659A.421 or sections 10 and 11 of this 2019 Act ; or
(b) ORS 653.470, except an action may not be brought for a claim relating to ORS 653.450.
(3) In any action under subsection  (1) of this section alleging a violation of ORS 25.337, 25.424,
652.220, 652.355, 653.547, 653.549, 659.852,  659A.030, 659A.040, 659A.043, 659A.046, 659A.069,
659A.082, 659A.103 to 659A.145,  659A.199, 659A.203, 659A.228, 659A.230, 659A.250 to 659A.262,
659A.290, 659A.318, 659A.355 or 659A.421 or sections 10 and 11 of this 2019 Act :
(a) The court may award, in  addition to the relief authorized under subsection (1) of this section,
compensatory damages or $200, whichever is greater, and punitive damages;
(b) At the request of any party, the action shall be tried to a jury;
(c) Upon appeal of any judgment finding a violation, the appellate court shall review the judg-
ment pursuant to the standard established by ORS 19.415 (1); and
(d) Any attorney fee agreement shall be subject to approval by the court.
(4) Notwithstanding ORS 31.730, in an action under subsection (1) of this section  alleging a vi-
olation of ORS 652.220, the court may award punitive damages if:
(a) It is proved by clear and convincing evidence that an employer has engaged  in fraud, acted
with malice or acted with willful and wanton misconduct; or
(b) An employer was previously adjudicated  in a proceeding under this section or under ORS
659A.850 for a violation of ORS 652.220.
Enrolled House Bill 2005 (HB 2005-B) Page 28
(5) In any action under subsection (1) of this section  alleging a violation of ORS 653.060, the
court may award, in addition to the relief authorized under subsection (1)  of this section,
compensatory damages or $200, whichever is greater.
(6) In any action under subsection (1) of this section alleging a violation of  ORS 171.120, 476.574
or 659A.218, the court may award, in addition  to the relief authorized under subsection (1) of this
section, compensatory damages or $250, whichever is greater.
(7) In any action  under subsection (1) of this section alleging a violation of ORS 10.090 or 10.092,
the court may award,  in addition to the relief authorized under subsection (1) of this section, a civil
penalty in the amount of $720.
(8) Any individual against whom any distinction, discrimination  or restriction on account of
race, color, religion, sex, sexual  orientation, national origin, marital status or age, if the individual
is 18 years of age or older, has been made by any place of public accommodation, as defined in ORS
659A.400, by any employee or person  acting on behalf of the place or by any person aiding or
abetting the place or person in violation of ORS 659A.406  may bring an action against the operator
or manager of  the place, the employee or person acting on behalf of the place or the aider or abettor
of the place or  person. Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, in an action under this sub-
section:
(a) The court may award, in  addition to the relief authorized under subsection (1) of this section,
compensatory and punitive damages;
(b) The operator or manager of the place  of public accommodation, the employee or person
acting on behalf of the place, and  any aider or abettor shall be jointly and severally liable for all
damages awarded in the action;
(c) At the request of any party, the action shall be tried to a jury;
(d) The court shall award reasonable attorney fees to a prevailing plaintiff;
(e) The court may award reasonable attorney fees and expert witness  fees incurred by a de-
fendant who prevails only if  the court determines that the plaintiff had no objectively reasonable
basis for asserting a claim or  no reasonable basis for appealing an adverse decision of a trial court;
and
(f) Upon any appeal of a judgment under this subsection, the appellate court shall review the
judgment pursuant to the standard established by ORS 19.415 (1).
(9) When the commissioner or the Attorney  General has reasonable cause to believe that a
person or group of persons is engaged in a pattern or practice of resistance to the  rights protected
by ORS 659A.145 or 659A.421 or federal housing law, or that a group of persons has been denied
any of the rights protected by ORS 659A.145 or  659A.421 or federal housing law, the commissioner
or the Attorney General may file a civil action on behalf of the aggrieved persons in the same
manner as a person or group of  persons may file a civil action under this section. In a civil action
filed under this subsection, the court may assess  against the respondent, in addition to the relief
authorized under subsections (1) and (3) of this section, a civil penalty:
(a) In an amount not exceeding $50,000 for a first violation; and
(b) In an amount not exceeding $100,000 for any subsequent violation.
(10) In any action under subsection (1)  of this section alleging a violation of ORS 659A.145 or
659A.421 or alleging discrimination under federal  housing law, when the commissioner is pursuing
the action on behalf of an aggrieved complainant,  the court shall award reasonable attorney fees to
the commissioner if the commissioner prevails  in the action. The court may award reasonable at-
torney fees and expert witness fees incurred by a defendant that prevails in the  action if the court
determines that the commissioner had no objectively reasonable basis for asserting  the claim or for
appealing an adverse decision of the trial court.
(11) In an action under subsection (1) or  (9) of this section alleging a violation of ORS 659A.145
or 659A.421 or discrimination under federal housing law:
(a) “Aggrieved person” includes a person who believes that the person:
(A) Has been injured by an unlawful practice or discriminatory housing practice; or
Enrolled House Bill 2005 (HB 2005-B) Page 29
(B) Will be injured by an unlawful practice or discriminatory  housing practice that is about to
occur.
(b) An aggrieved person in regard to issues to be determined in an action may  intervene as of
right in the action. The Attorney General may intervene in the action if the  Attorney General cer-
tifies that the case is of general public importance. The court  may allow an intervenor prevailing
party costs and reasonable attorney fees at trial and on appeal.
SECTION 58.  ORS 659A.885, as amended by sections 9 and  10, chapter 197, Oregon Laws 2017,
and section 13, chapter 691, Oregon Laws 2017, is amended to read:
659A.885. (1) Any person claiming to be aggrieved by an  unlawful practice specified in sub-
section (2) of this section may  file a civil action in circuit court. In any action under this subsection,
the court may order injunctive relief  and any other equitable relief that may be appropriate, in-
cluding but not  limited to reinstatement or the hiring of employees with or without back pay. A
court may order back pay in an action under this subsection only for the two-year period  imme-
diately preceding the  filing of a complaint under ORS 659A.820 with the Commissioner of the Bureau
of Labor and Industries, or if a complaint was not filed before the action was  commenced, the two-
year period immediately preceding the filing of  the action. In any action under this subsection, the
court may allow the prevailing party costs and reasonable attorney fees at trial and on appeal. Ex-
cept as provided in subsection (3) of this section:
(a) The judge shall determine the facts in an action under this subsection; and
(b) Upon any appeal of a judgment in an action under this subsection, the appellate court shall
review the judgment pursuant to the standard established by ORS 19.415 (3).
(2) An action may be brought under subsection (1) of this section alleging a violation of:
(a) ORS 10.090, 10.092, 25.337, 25.424, 171.120, 408.230, 408.237 (2), 475B.281, 476.574, 652.020,
652.220, 652.355, 653.060, 653.263, 653.265,  653.547, 653.549, 653.601 to 653.661, 659.852, 659A.030,
659A.040, 659A.043, 659A.046, 659A.063, 659A.069, 659A.082, 659A.088, 659A.103 to 659A.145,
659A.150 to 659A.186, 659A.194, 659A.199, 659A.203, 659A.218, 659A.228, 659A.230, 659A.233,
659A.236, 659A.250 to 659A.262, 659A.277, 659A.290, 659A.300, 659A.306, 659A.309, 659A.315,
659A.318, 659A.320, 659A.355, 659A.357 or 659A.421  or sections 10 and 11 of this 2019 Act ; or
(b) ORS 653.470, except an action may not be brought for a claim relating to ORS 653.450.
(3) In any action under subsection  (1) of this section alleging a violation of ORS 25.337, 25.424,
652.220, 652.355, 653.547, 653.549, 659.852,  659A.030, 659A.040, 659A.043, 659A.046, 659A.069,
659A.082, 659A.103 to 659A.145,  659A.199, 659A.203, 659A.228, 659A.230, 659A.250 to 659A.262,
659A.290, 659A.318, 659A.355, 659A.357 or 659A.421 or sections 10 and 11 of this 2019 Act :
(a) The court may award, in  addition to the relief authorized under subsection (1) of this section,
compensatory damages or $200, whichever is greater, and punitive damages;
(b) At the request of any party, the action shall be tried to a jury;
(c) Upon appeal of any judgment finding a violation, the appellate court shall review the judg-
ment pursuant to the standard established by ORS 19.415 (1); and
(d) Any attorney fee agreement shall be subject to approval by the court.
(4) Notwithstanding ORS 31.730, in an action under subsection (1) of this section  alleging a vi-
olation of ORS 652.220, the court may award punitive damages if:
(a) It is proved by clear and convincing evidence that an employer has engaged  in fraud, acted
with malice or acted with willful and wanton misconduct; or
(b) An employer was previously adjudicated  in a proceeding under this section or under ORS
659A.850 for a violation of ORS 652.220.
(5) In any action under subsection (1) of this section  alleging a violation of ORS 653.060, the
court may award, in addition to the relief authorized under subsection (1)  of this section,
compensatory damages or $200, whichever is greater.
(6) In any action under subsection (1) of this section alleging a violation of  ORS 171.120, 476.574
or 659A.218, the court may award, in addition to the  relief authorized under subsection (1) of this
section, compensatory damages or $250, whichever is greater.
Enrolled House Bill 2005 (HB 2005-B) Page 30
(7) In any action  under subsection (1) of this section alleging a violation of ORS 10.090 or 10.092,
the court may award,  in addition to the relief authorized under subsection (1) of this section, a civil
penalty in the amount of $720.
(8) Any individual against whom any  distinction, discrimination or restriction on account of
race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, national origin, marital status or  age, if the individual
is 18 years of age or older, has been made by any place of public accommodation, as defined in ORS
659A.400, by any employee or person acting on behalf of the place or  by any person aiding or
abetting the place or person in violation of ORS 659A.406  may bring an action against the operator
or manager of  the place, the employee or person acting on behalf of the place or the aider or abettor
of the place or person. Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, in an action  under this sub-
section:
(a) The court may award, in  addition to the relief authorized under subsection (1) of this section,
compensatory and punitive damages;
(b) The operator or manager of the place  of public accommodation, the employee or person
acting on behalf of the place, and any aider or abettor shall be  jointly and severally liable for all
damages awarded in the action;
(c) At the request of any party, the action shall be tried to a jury;
(d) The court shall award reasonable attorney fees to a prevailing plaintiff;
(e) The court may award reasonable  attorney fees and expert witness fees incurred by a de-
fendant who prevails only if the court determines that the plaintiff  had no objectively reasonable
basis for asserting a claim or  no reasonable basis for appealing an adverse decision of a trial court;
and
(f) Upon any appeal of a judgment under this subsection, the appellate court shall review the
judgment pursuant to the standard established by ORS 19.415 (1).
(9) When the commissioner or the Attorney General has  reasonable cause to believe that a
person or group of persons is engaged in a pattern or practice of resistance to the  rights protected
by ORS 659A.145 or 659A.421 or federal housing law, or that a group of persons has been denied
any of the rights protected by ORS 659A.145  or 659A.421 or federal housing law, the commissioner
or the Attorney General may file a civil action on behalf of the aggrieved persons in the same
manner as a person or group of persons may file a civil action under  this section. In a civil action
filed under this subsection, the court may assess against  the respondent, in addition to the relief
authorized under subsections (1) and (3) of this section, a civil penalty:
(a) In an amount not exceeding $50,000 for a first violation; and
(b) In an amount not exceeding $100,000 for any subsequent violation.
(10) In any action under subsection (1) of this section alleging  a violation of ORS 659A.145 or
659A.421 or alleging discrimination under federal housing law,  when the commissioner is pursuing
the action on behalf of an aggrieved complainant,  the court shall award reasonable attorney fees to
the commissioner if the commissioner prevails in the action. The  court may award reasonable at-
torney fees and expert witness  fees incurred by a defendant that prevails in the action if the court
determines that the commissioner had no objectively reasonable basis for asserting  the claim or for
appealing an adverse decision of the trial court.
(11) In an action under subsection (1) or  (9) of this section alleging a violation of ORS 659A.145
or 659A.421 or discrimination under federal housing law:
(a) “Aggrieved person” includes a person who believes that the person:
(A) Has been injured by an unlawful practice or discriminatory housing practice; or
(B) Will be injured by an unlawful  practice or discriminatory housing practice that is about to
occur.
(b) An aggrieved person in regard to issues to be determined in an action may  intervene as of
right in the action. The Attorney General may intervene in the action if the  Attorney General cer-
tifies that the case is of general public importance. The court  may allow an intervenor prevailing
party costs and reasonable attorney fees at trial and on appeal.
Enrolled House Bill 2005 (HB 2005-B) Page 31
APPROPRIATION LOAN
SECTION 59. There is appropriated to the Employment Department, for  the biennium
beginning July 1, 2019, out of the General Fund, the amount of $15,688,586, to  enable the de-
partment to cover start-up  costs related to the establishment of the family and medical leave
insurance program under section 33 of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 60. When the Employment Department determines that  moneys in sufficient
amount are available in the Paid Family and Medical Leave Insurance Fund established under
section 39 of this 2019 Act, but in no event later than  January 1, 2023, the department shall
reimburse the General Fund,  without interest, in an amount equal to the amount from the
General Fund appropriated as provided in section 59 of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 60a.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (6), chapter , Oregon Laws 2019 (Enrolled  Sen-
ate Bill 5515), for the biennium  beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment
of expenses  from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but ex-
cluding lottery funds  and federal funds, collected or received by the Department of Justice
for the General Counsel Division, is increased by $219,016 to provide legal services  to state
agencies related to the implementation of sections 1 to 51 of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 61. Preemption. Except as  provided in section 43 of this 2019 Act, sections 1
to 51 of this 2019 Act supersede and preempt any rule, regulation, code  or ordinance of any
unit of a local government, as defined in ORS 174.116, relating to paid family  and medical
leave.
TRANSITIONAL PROVISIONS
SECTION 62. The Director of the Employment Department shall establish the family and
medical leave insurance program under section 33 of this 2019 Act such that eligible em-
ployees as defined in section 2 of this 2019 Act and  employers may begin making contrib-
utions to the program no later than January 1, 2022.
SECTION 62a.
Notwithstanding the operative date specified in section 63 (1)(a)  of this
2019 Act, an employer may apply  to the Director of the Employment Department, in ac-
cordance with the application process established by the director under  section 33 of this
2019 Act, for approval of an employer-offered benefit  plan described under section 43 of this
2019 Act on or after the effective date of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 63. Operative dates. (1)(a) Sections 8, 11, 14, 16 to 31, 37, 41, 43 to 48, 49a and
61 of this 2019 Act become operative on January 1, 2022.
(b) Sections 3  to 7, 9, 10, 12, 13, 15, 42 and 50 of this 2019 Act become operative on Jan-
uary 1, 2023.
(c) The amendments to ORS 410.619 by sections 52 and 53 of this  2019 Act become oper-
ative on January 1, 2022.
(d) The amendments to ORS 657.100, 657.471 and 659A.162 by sections 54, 55 and 56 of this
2019 Act become operative on January 1, 2023.
(e) The amendments to ORS 659A.885 by sections 57 and 58 of this  2019 Act become op-
erative January 1, 2025.
(2) The Employment Department and the  Department of Revenue may take any action
before the operative dates specified in subsection (1) of this section  that is necessary to en-
able the departments to exercise, on and after  the operative dates specified in subsection (1)
of this  section, the duties, functions and powers conferred on the departments by sections
1 to 51 of this 2019 Act.
CAPTIONS
Enrolled House Bill 2005 (HB 2005-B) Page 32
SECTION 64. The unit and section captions used in this 2019 Act are provided only  for
the convenience of the reader  and do not become part of the statutory law of this state or
express any legislative intent in the enactment of this 2019 Act.
EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 65. This 2019 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2019
regular session of the Eightieth Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Passed by House June 20, 2019
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 30, 2019
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Bev Clarno, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2005 (HB 2005-B) Page 33